Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF357.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2271YH (4) 91 th/ns H.F. 357 Section 1. Section 321.52, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. The owner of a motor vehicle subject to registration 3 that who does not have a certificate of title or a junking 4 certificate may dispose of the vehicle to a vehicle recycler 5 licensed under chapter 321H for scrap or junk if the vehicle 6 is twelve model years old or older and is acquired by the 7 vehicle recycler for reasonable consideration equaling less 8 than one thousand dollars. A licensed vehicle recycler shall 9 not acquire such a vehicle unless the recycler verifies there 10 is not a lienholder who has a security interest in the vehicle. 11